Florida, session 2026, HB445.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. This act may be cited as "Missy's Law."
Section 2. Section 903.0472, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
903.0472 Mandatory remand to custody upon conviction of
dangerous crimes.—
(1) Notwithstanding any provision in this chapter or
chapter 924 to the contrary, the court shall remand a person to
custody immediately, and the person shall remain in custody
pending sentencing without the possibility of release on bond,
if the person pleads guilty or nolo contendere to, or is found
guilty of, regardless of adjudication, a dangerous crime as
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb445 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 445 2026 Legislature
defined in s. 907.041(5)(a).
(2) This section applies regardless of whether the person
intends to appeal or has filed a notice of appeal.
(3) This section does not apply if the plea or finding of
guilt that required the person to be remanded to custody under
subsection (1) has been:
(a) Vacated;
(b) Reversed on appeal;
(c) Set aside by judgment of acquittal; or
(d) Otherwise nullified.
Section 3. Paragraph (a) of subsection (5) of section
907.041, Florida Statutes, is reordered and amended to read:
907.041 Pretrial detention and release.—
(5) PRETRIAL DETENTION.—
(a) As used in this subsection, "dangerous crime" means
any of the following:
1. Arson;
2. Aggravated assault;
3. Aggravated battery;
4. Illegal use of explosives;
5. Child abuse or aggravated child abuse;
6. Abuse of an elderly person or disabled adult, or
aggravated abuse of an elderly person or disabled adult;
7. Aircraft piracy;
8. Kidnapping;
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb445 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 445 2026 Legislature
9. Homicide;
10. Manslaughter, including DUI manslaughter and BUI
manslaughter;
11. Sexual battery;
12. Robbery;
13. Carjacking;
14. Lewd, lascivious, or indecent assault or act upon or
in presence of a child under the age of 16 years;
15. Sexual activity with a child, who is 12 years of age
or older but less than 18 years of age, by or at solicitation of
person in familial or custodial authority;
16. Burglary of a dwelling;
17. Stalking and aggravated stalking;
18. Act of domestic violence as defined in s. 741.28;
19. Home invasion robbery;
20. Act of terrorism as defined in s. 775.30;
21. Manufacturing any substances in violation of chapter
893;
22. Attempting or conspiring to commit any such crime;
22.23. Human trafficking;
23.24. Trafficking in any controlled substance described
in s. 893.135(1)(c)4.;
24.25. Extortion in violation of s. 836.05; and
25.26. Written threats to kill in violation of s. 836.10;
26. Any violation related to computer pornography or child
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb445 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 445 2026 Legislature
exploitation as described in s. 847.0135; and
27. Attempting or conspiring to commit any such crime.
Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb445 -02-er